Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 3. Licensing of Sport Fishing and Hunting.

Administrative Code. —

For sport fishing and personal use fishery, see 5 AAC, part 2.

For game, see 5 AAC, part 3.

Sec. 16.05.330.
Licenses, tags, and subsistence permits; immunity for damage to electronic devices.

Except as otherwise permitted in this chapter, without having the appropriate license, tag, or permit in actual possession, a person may not engage in

sport fishing, including the taking of razor clams;

hunting or trapping;

the farming of fish, fur, or game;

taxidermy or fur dealing; or

control of nuisance wild birds and nuisance wild small mammals for compensation.

When obtaining the appropriate license or tag in (a) of this section, an applicant who asserts residency in the state shall provide the license vendor with the proof of residence that the department requires by regulation.

The Board of Fisheries and the Board of Game may adopt regulations providing for the issuance and expiration of subsistence permits for areas, villages, communities, groups, or individuals as needed for authorizing, regulating, and monitoring the subsistence harvest of fish and game. The boards shall adopt these regulations when the subsistence preference requires a reduction in the harvest of a fish stock or game population by nonsubsistence users.

A person may not receive a sport fishing, hunting, or trapping license or other permit or tag issued under AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

, if the person’s right to obtain, or exercise the privileges granted by, a sport fishing, hunting, or trapping license is suspended or revoked in another state. A person who applies for a sport fishing, hunting, or trapping license or other permit or tag issued under AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

shall sign a statement that the person’s right to obtain, or exercise the privileges granted by, a sport fishing, hunting, or trapping license is not suspended or revoked in another state.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 39 SLA 2001.]

A person charged with violating (a)(1) or (2) of this section for failure to have a license in actual possession may not be convicted if the person provides, not later than 30 days after the issuance of the citation, evidence satisfactory to the arresting or citing agency of a license previously issued to the person that was valid at the time of the offense.

A license in actual possession may be in paper or electronic form.

A peace officer presented with an electronic device under (g) of this section is immune from any liability resulting from damage to the device, except that a peace officer may be liable for civil damages that are the result of the peace officer’s intentional misconduct.

History.

(§ 1 art II ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 140 SLA 1968; am § 8 ch 52 SLA 1986; am § 16 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 7 ch 106 SLA 1992; am § 6 ch 132 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 39 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 132 SLA 2003; am §§ 1, 2 ch 54 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For seasons and bag limits, see 5 AAC 85, art. 2.

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

For emergency taking, see 5 AAC 92, art. 9.

For licensing, see 15 AAC 116, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 14, 2018, in the introductory language in (a), added “, or permit” following “license, tag” and made related changes, in (a)(2), deleted “, or fur dealing” at the end, and made related changes, in (a)(4), inserted “or fur dealing” following “taxidermy”; added (f) — (h).

Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 4, ch. 54, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 13, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 14, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Alaska’s fish and game laws are applicable as federal law on military reservations. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

Hunting or fishing at a military reservation must be in accord with Alaska laws regulating seasons, bag limits, methods of taking, etc., but military personnel are not required to comply with licensing requirements while on reservation. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

Since
AS

16.05.940

(14) [now (28)] does not grant special resident privileges to military personnel, which is a requisite for requiring them to purchase licenses for use on military reservations under
10 U.S.C. 2671(a)(2), they cannot be required to do so.
1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

Construing this section and
AS

16.05.340

against federal law ( 10 U.S.C. § 2671(a)), a member of the military who does not qualify as a resident under AS

16.05.940

is not required to obtain an Alaska trapping license to trap on military lands.
1977 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21.

Sec. 16.05.331.
Elk farming. [Renumbered as AS 16.40.050.]

Sec. 16.05.332.
Wildlife Violator Compact.

The Wildlife Violator Compact as contained in this section is enacted into law and entered into on behalf of the State of Alaska with any other states legally joining it in a form substantially as follows:

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 2008)

ARTICLE I FINDINGS, DECLARATION OF POLICY, AND PURPOSES

Section 1. Findings. The party states find that

Wildlife resources are managed in trust by the respective states for the benefit of all residents and visitors.

The protection of their respective wildlife resources are materially affected by the degree of compliance with state statute, regulation, ordinance, or administrative rule relating to the management of those resources.

The preservation, protection, management, and restoration of wildlife contributes immeasurably to the aesthetic, recreational, and economic aspects of those natural resources.

Wildlife resources are valuable without regard to political boundaries and, therefore, all persons must be required to comply with wildlife preservation, protection, management, and restoration statutes, ordinances, and administrative rules and regulations of all party states as a condition precedent to the continuance or issuance of any license to hunt, fish, trap, or possess wildlife.

The violation of wildlife laws interferes with the management of wildlife resources and may endanger the safety of persons and property.

The mobility of many wildlife law violators necessitates the maintenance of channels of communications among the various states.

In most instances, a person who is cited for a wildlife violation in a state other than the person’s home state

must post collateral or a bond to secure the person’s appearance for a trial at a later date;

if unable to post collateral or a bond, is taken into custody until the collateral or bond is posted; or

is taken directly to court for an immediate appearance.

The purpose of the enforcement practices described in (g) of this section is to ensure compliance with the terms of a wildlife citation by the person who, if permitted to continue on the person’s way after receiving the citation, could return to the person’s home state and disregard the person’s duty under the terms of the citation.

In most instances, a person receiving a wildlife citation in the person’s home state is permitted to accept the citation from the officer at the scene of the violation and continue immediately on the person’s way after agreeing to comply with the terms of the citation.

The practice described in (g) of this section causes unnecessary inconvenience and, at times, a hardship for the person who is unable at the time to post collateral, furnish a bond, stand trial, or pay a fine and, therefore, is compelled to remain in custody until another arrangement is made.

The enforcement practices described in (g) of this section consume an undue amount of law enforcement time.

Sec. 2. Policies. The policies of the party states are to

(a)

Promote compliance with the statutes, ordinances, regulations and administrative rules relating to management of wildlife resources in their respective states.

(b)

Recognize the suspension of wildlife license privileges of any person whose license privileges have been suspended by a party state and treat the suspension as if it had occurred in their state.

(c)

Allow a violator to accept a wildlife citation, except as provided in subsection (b) of article III, and proceed on the person’s way without delay whether or not the person is a resident in the state in which the citation was issued if the person’s home state is a party to this compact.

(d)

Report to the appropriate party state, as provided in the compact manual, any conviction recorded against any person whose home state was not the issuing state.

(e)

Allow the home state to recognize and treat convictions recorded for its residents which occurred in another party state as if they had occurred in the home state.

(f)

Extend cooperation to its fullest extent among the party states for obtaining compliance with the terms of a wildlife citation issued in one party state to a resident of another party state.

(g)

Maximize the effective use of law enforcement personnel and information.

(h)

Assist court systems in the efficient disposition of wildlife violations.

Sec. 3. Purposes. The purposes of this compact are to:

(a)

Provide a means by which the party states may participate in a reciprocal program to carry out the policies set forth in section 2 of this article in a uniform and orderly manner.

(b)

Provide for the fair and impartial treatment of wildlife violators operating within party states in recognition of the persons’ right of due process in the sovereign status of a party state.

ARTICLE II DEFINITIONS

As used in this compact, unless the context otherwise requires,

“Citation” means any summons, complaint, summons and complaint, ticket, penalty assessment or other official document issued by a wildlife officer or other peace officer for a wildlife violation containing an order that requires the person to respond.

“Collateral” means any cash or other security deposited to secure an appearance for trial in connection with the issuance by a wildlife officer or other peace officer of a citation for a wildlife violation.

“Compliance” means the act of answering a citation by appearing in a court or tribunal or the payment of fines, costs, or surcharges, if any.

“Conviction” means a conviction, including any court conviction, of any offense related to the preservation, protection, management, or restoration of wildlife which is prohibited by state statute, regulation, ordinance, or administrative rule, or a forfeiture of bail, bond, or other security deposited to secure the appearance of a person charged with any such offense, or the payment of a penalty assessment or a plea of nolo contendere, or the imposition of a deferred or suspended sentence by the court.

“Court” means a court of law, including magistrate’s court and the justice of the peace court.

“Home state” means the state of primary residence of a person.

“Issuing state” means the party state that issues a wildlife citation.

“License” means any license, permit, or other public document that conveys to the person to whom it is issued the privilege of pursuing, possessing, or taking any wildlife regulated by statute, regulation, ordinance, or administrative rule of a party state.

“Licensing authority” means

in each other party state, the department or division within the party state that is authorized by law to issue or approve licenses or permits to hunt, fish, trap, or possess wildlife; and

in this state, the Department of Public Safety.

“Party state” means any state that enacts legislation to become a member of this compact.

“Personal recognizance” means an agreement by a person made at the time of the issuance of the wildlife citation that the person will comply with the terms of that citation.

“State” means any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Provinces of Canada, or any other countries.

“Suspension” means any revocation, denial, or withdrawal of any license privileges, including the privilege to apply for, purchase, or exercise the benefits conferred by any license.

“Terms of the citation” means those conditions and options expressly stated in the citation.

“Wildlife” means all species of animals, including, but not limited to, mammals, birds, fish, reptiles, amphibians, mollusks and crustaceans, that are defined as wildlife and are protected or otherwise regulated by statute, regulation, ordinance, or administrative rule in a party state. Species included in the definition of wildlife vary from state to state and a determination of whether a species is wildlife for the purposes of this compact must be based on local law. In this state, “wildlife” means all species of fish and game as these terms are defined in AS

16.05.940

.

“Wildlife law” means any statute, regulation, ordinance, or administrative rule enacted to manage wildlife resources and the use thereof.

“Wildlife officer” means any person authorized by a party state to issue a citation for a wildlife violation.

“Wildlife violation” means any cited violation of statute, regulation, ordinance, or administrative rule enacted to manage wildlife resources and the use thereof.

ARTICLE III PROCEDURES FOR ISSUING STATE

Issuing state procedures are as follows:

When issuing a citation for a wildlife violation, a wildlife officer shall issue a citation to any person whose primary residence is in a party state in the same manner as if the person were a resident of the home state. The wildlife officer may not require the person to post collateral to secure that person’s appearance, subject to the exceptions set forth in paragraph (b) of this article, if the officer receives the person’s personal recognizance that the person will comply with the terms of the citation.

Personal recognizance is permissible if

it is not prohibited by local law or the compact manual; and

the violator provides adequate proof of the violator’s identity to the wildlife officer.

Upon conviction or failure of a person to comply with the terms of a wildlife citation, the appropriate officer shall report the conviction or the failure to comply to the licensing authority of the party state in which the wildlife citation was issued. The report must be made in accordance with the procedures specified by the issuing state and contain information as specified in the compact manual as minimum requirements for effective processing by the home state.

Upon the receipt of the report of conviction or noncompliance required by (c) of this article, the licensing authority of the issuing state shall transmit to the licensing authority in the home state of the violator the information in the manner prescribed in the compact manual.

ARTICLE IV PROCEDURES FOR HOME STATE

Home state procedures are as follows:

Upon the receipt of a report of failure to comply with the terms of a citation from the licensing authority of the issuing state, the licensing authority of the home state shall notify the violator and begin a suspension action in accordance with the home state’s suspension procedures. The licensing authority of the home state shall suspend the violator’s license privileges until satisfactory evidence of compliance with the terms of the wildlife citation has been furnished by the issuing state to the home state licensing authority. Due process rights must be accorded to the violator.

Upon the receipt of a report of conviction from the licensing authority of the issuing state, the licensing authority of the home state shall enter the conviction in its records and consider the conviction as if it had occurred in the home state for the purposes of the suspension of license privileges.

The licensing authority of the home state shall maintain a record of actions taken and make reports to the issuing states as provided in the compact manual.

ARTICLE V RECIPROCAL RECOGNITION OF SUSPENSION

The party states agree that

all party states shall recognize the suspension of license privileges of any person by any state as if the violation on which the suspension is based had occurred in their state and would have been the basis for suspension of license privileges in their state.

each party state shall communicate information concerning the suspension of license privileges to the other party states in the manner prescribed in the compact manual.

ARTICLE VI APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAWS

The party states agree that, except as expressly required by the provisions of this compact, nothing included in this compact shall be construed to affect the right of any party state to apply any of its laws relating to license privileges to any person or circumstance or to invalidate or prevent any agreement or other cooperative arrangements between a party state and a nonparty state concerning wildlife law enforcement.

ARTICLE VII COMPACT ADMINISTRATOR PROCEDURES

The party states agree that

For the purpose of administering the provisions of this compact and to serve as a governing body for the resolution of all matters relating to the operation of this compact, a board of compact administrators is hereby established. The board must be composed of one representative from each of the party states to be known as the compact administrator. The compact administrator shall be appointed by the head of the licensing authority of each party state and shall serve and be subject to removal in accordance with the laws of the state that the compact administrator represents. A compact administrator may provide for the discharge of the compact administrator’s duties and the performance of the compact administrator’s functions as a board member by an alternate. An alternate may not serve unless written notification of the alternate’s identity has been given to the board.

Each member of the board of compact administrators is entitled to one vote. No action of the board is binding unless taken at a meeting at which a majority of the total number of votes on the board are cast in favor thereof. Action by the board must be only at a meeting at which a majority of the party states are represented.

The board shall elect annually, from its membership, a chair and vice chair.

The board shall adopt bylaws, not inconsistent with the provisions of this compact or the laws of a party state, for the conduct of its business and may amend or rescind its bylaws.

The board may accept for any of its purposes and functions under this compact any donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, conditional or otherwise, from any state, the United States, or any governmental agency and may receive, use, and dispose of them as it deems appropriate.

The board may contract with, or accept services or personnel from, any governmental or intergovernmental agency, person, firm, corporation, or private nonprofit organization or institution.

The board shall establish all necessary procedures and develop uniform forms and documents for administering the provisions of this compact. All procedures and forms adopted pursuant to board action must be included in the compact manual.

ARTICLE VIII ENTRY INTO AND WITHDRAWAL FROM COMPACT

The party states agree that

This compact becomes effective upon adoption by at least two states.

Entry into the compact must be made by a resolution of ratification executed by the authorized officers of the applying state and submitted to the chairman of the board of compact administrators.

The resolution must be in a form and content as provided in the compact manual and include

a citation of the authority by which the state is authorized to become a party to this compact;

an agreement to comply with the terms and provisions of the compact; and

a statement that entry into the compact is with all states then party to the compact and with any state that legally becomes a party to the compact.

The effective date of entry must be specified by the applying state, except that the effective date must not be less than 60 days after notice has been given by

the chair of the board of the compact administrators; or

the secretary of the board of compact administrators to each party state that the resolution from the applying state has been received.

A party state may withdraw from the compact by giving official written notice to the other party states. A withdrawal does not take effect until 90 days after the notice of withdrawal is given. The notice must be directed to the compact administrator of each party state. The withdrawal of a party state does not affect the validity of the compact as to the remaining party states.

ARTICLE IX AMENDMENTS TO THE COMPACT

The party states agree that

This compact may be amended from time to time. Amendments must be presented in resolution form to the chair of the board of compact administrators and may be proposed by one or more party states.

The adoption of an amendment must be endorsed by all party states and becomes effective 30 days after the date the last party state endorses the amendment.

The failure of a party state to respond to the chair of the board of compact administrators within 120 days after the receipt of the proposed amendment constitutes an endorsement.

ARTICLE X CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

The party states agree that this compact must be liberally construed so as to carry out the purposes stated in the compact. The provisions of this compact are severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of the compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of the compact is not affected thereby. If this compact is held contrary to the constitution of any party state thereto, the compact remains in effect as to the remaining states and to the state affected as to all severable matters.

ARTICLE XI TITLE

The party states agree that this compact will be known as the Wildlife Violator Compact.

Sec. 16.05.334.
Application of Wildlife Violator Compact.

The provisions of AS

16.05.332

do not apply to violations involving

commercial fishing; or

commercial activities of providers of services to big game hunters; for purposes of this section, “services to big game hunters” has the meaning given to “big game hunting services” under AS

08.54.790

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 87 SLA 2008)

Sec. 16.05.335.
Complimentary licenses.

The commissioner shall annually, at the request of the governor, provide the governor with not more than 50 complimentary fishing and hunting licenses and appropriate big game tags which the governor may distribute to distinguished visitors to the state for their use in any one season during their visits to the state. The complimentary license for sport fishing or hunting or both shall be inscribed by the governor with the inclusive dates for its authorized use. The governor shall advise the department on any complimentary issuances, which information shall be available to the public.

History.

(§ 1 art II ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 1965; am E.O. No. 73 § 2 (1989))

Sec. 16.05.340.
License, permit, and tag fees; surcharge; miscellaneous permits to take fish and game.

Fees for licenses, permits, and tags are as follows:

Resident sport fishing license . . . . . $ 20 However, the fee is 50 cents for a resident who is blind.

Resident hunting license . . . . . 35

Resident hunting and trapping license . . . . . 55

Resident trapping license . . . . . 25

Resident hunting and sport fishing license . . . . . 50

Resident hunting, trapping, and sport fishing license . . . . . 75;

however, the fee is $5 for an applicant who has an annual family or household income equal to or less than the most recent poverty guidelines for the state set by the United States Department of Health and Human Services for the year preceding application;

a person paying $5 for a resident hunting, trapping, and sport fishing license must provide proof of eligibility under this paragraph when requested by the department.

Nonresident sport fishing license — valid for the period inscribed on the license

For 14-day license . . . . . 75

For seven-day license . . . . . 45

For three-day license . . . . . 30

For one-day license . . . . . 15

Nonresident annual sport fishing license . . . . . 100

Nonresident hunting license . . . . . 130

[Repealed, § 10 ch 74 SLA 1997.]

Nonresident hunting and trapping license . . . . . 375

Fur dealers

Resident fur dealer biennial license . . . . . 150

Nonresident fur dealer biennial license . . . . . 500

Taxidermists

Resident taxidermy biennial license . . . . . 200

Nonresident taxidermy biennial license . . . . . 500

Aquatic farming triennial license . . . . . 400

Nonresident big game tagsA nonresident may not take a big game animal without previously purchasing a numbered, nontransferable, appropriate tag, issued under this paragraph. The tag must be affixed to the animal before leaving the kill site and must remain affixed until the animal is prepared for storage, consumed, or exported. A tag issued but not used for an animal may be used to satisfy the tagging requirement for an animal of any other species for which the tag fee is of equal or less value.

Bear, black, each . . . . . 450

Bear, brown or grizzly, each . . . . . 1,000

Bison, each . . . . . 900

Caribou, each . . . . . 650

Deer, each . . . . . 300

Elk, each . . . . . 600

Goat, each . . . . . 600

Moose, each . . . . . 800

Sheep, each . . . . . 850

Wolf, each . . . . . 60 A nonresident is not required to have a nonresident wolf tag to take a wolf in a game management unit if the Board of Game has adopted an intensive management program under AS

16.05.255(e)

for all or a portion of the game management unit.

Wolverine, each . . . . . 350

Musk oxen, each . . . . . 2,200

Resident big game tags

Bear, brown or grizzly, each . . . . . 25 The Board of Game may, by regulation effective for not more than one year, eliminate the resident brown or grizzly bear tag and fee for all or a portion of a game management unit.

Musk oxen, each . . . . . 500 However, the Board of Game may by regulation reduce or eliminate the resident big game tag and fee for musk oxen for all or a portion of a game management unit.

Waterfowl conservation tag . . . . . 10

A person may not engage in waterfowl hunting without having the current year’s waterfowl tag in the person’s actual possession, unless that person

qualifies for a $5 license fee under (6) of this subsection;

is a resident under 18 years of age;

is 60 years of age or older and is a resident;

is a disabled veteran eligible for a free license under AS

16.05.341

.

The Board of Game shall by regulation exempt the requirement of a waterfowl conservation tag for waterfowl hunting in areas of the state not likely to benefit from programs described in AS 16.05.130(b)(2) — (4).

Game farming

Game mammal or game reptile farming biennial license . . . . . 250

Game bird farming biennial license . . . . . 50

Nonresident small game hunting license . . . . . 30

Nonresident alien hunting license . . . . . 600 A nonresident alien may not take a big game animal without previously purchasing a numbered, nontransferable, appropriate tag, issued under (21) of this subsection. The tag must be affixed to the animal before leaving the kill site and must remain affixed until the animal is prepared for storage, consumed, or exported. A tag issued but not used for an animal may be used to satisfy the tagging requirement for an animal of any other species for which the tag fee is of equal or less value.

Nonresident alien big game tags

Bear, black, each . . . . . 600

Bear, brown or grizzly, each . . . . . 1,300

Bison, each . . . . . 1,300

Caribou, each . . . . . 850

Deer, each . . . . . 400

Elk, each . . . . . 800

Goat, each . . . . . 800

Moose, each . . . . . 1,000

Musk oxen, each . . . . . 3,000

Sheep, each . . . . . 1,100

Wolf, each . . . . . 100 A nonresident alien is not required to have a nonresident alien wolf tag to take a wolf in a game management unit if the Board of Game has adopted an intensive management program under AS

16.05.255(e)

for all or a portion of the game management unit.

Wolverine, each . . . . . 500

Chitina dip net fishing permit . . . . . 15 The members of the family of a person who has obtained a Chitina dip net fishing permit are not required to have a Chitina dip net fishing permit while they are engaged in dip net fishing at Chitina if they are engaged in fishing in the presence of the person and the person has the Chitina dip net fishing permit in the person’s physical possession. In this paragraph, “family” means persons who are related by blood, marriage, or adoption and who live in the same household on a permanent basis.

Resident anadromous king salmon tag . . . . . 10 A resident may not engage in sport fishing for anadromous king salmon without having the current year’s anadromous king salmon tag in the resident’s actual possession, unless that person

qualifies for a 50 cent license fee under (1) of this subsection;

is under 18 years of age;

is 60 years of age or older and has been a resident of the state for at least one year;

is a disabled veteran eligible for a free license under AS

16.05.341

; or

qualifies for a $5 license fee under (6) of this subsection.

Nonresident anadromous king salmon tag — valid for the period inscribed on the tag

for a one-day tag . . . . . 15

for a three-day tag . . . . . 30

for a seven-day tag . . . . . 45

for a 14-day tag . . . . . 75

for an annual tag . . . . . 100 A nonresident may not engage in sport fishing for anadromous king salmon without having a valid anadromous king salmon tag in the person’s actual possession, unless that person is under 16 years of age. Members of the military service on active duty who are permanently stationed in the state, and their dependents, who do not qualify as residents under AS

16.05.415

, may obtain an annual nonresident military anadromous king salmon tag for $30.

Nuisance wild animal control license . . . . . 100

[Repealed, § 8, ch. 70, SLA 2004.]

[Repealed, § 5 ch 30 SLA 2016.]

The commissioner may issue without cost a permit to collect fish and game, including fur animals, subject to limitations and provisions that are appropriate, for a scientific, propagative, or educational purpose. The commissioner also may issue without cost a permit for the noncommercial control of nuisance wild birds or nuisance wild small mammals. The commissioner also may issue a permit for the collection of bivalve spat for use in connection with an aquatic farm. In addition, the commissioner shall issue a permit for the collecting of wild fur animals for improving the genetic stock of fur farm animals. Permits issued under this subsection shall be in accordance with current sustained yield management practices for the species of wild game for which the permit is requested. The annual permit fee for an Alaska resident to collect wild fur animals for fur farming purposes is the same as the fee for resident trappers.

The commissioner may issue a duplicate license or a duplicate tag as a replacement for a license or tag issued under (a) of this section. A fee of $5 shall be charged for each duplicate license or tag; however, a fee of $2 shall be charged for each duplicate of reduced fee license issued to an indigent or low income person under (a)(6) of this section. The duplicate license or tag may not be issued unless the commissioner or a delegate is satisfied that the original has been lost or destroyed.

Members of the military service or the United States Coast Guard on active duty who are permanently stationed in the state, and their dependents, who do not qualify as residents under AS

16.05.415

, may obtain special nonresident military hunting and sport fishing licenses at the rates for resident hunting and sport fishing licenses. A person who obtains a special nonresident military hunting license under this subsection is exempt from the requirements of (a)(15) of this section, but may not take a big game animal for which a tag is required under (a)(16) of this section or a mountain goat or sheep without previously purchasing a numbered, nontransferable appropriate tag, issued at the resident rate, under (a)(16) of this section. A person who obtains a special nonresident military hunting license under this subsection may obtain a numbered, nontransferable tag for mountain goat or sheep at no cost.

[Repealed, § 27 ch 71 SLA 1986.]

[Repealed, § 4 ch 81 SLA 1992.]

A hunting, trapping, or fishing license, tag, or permit for which a fee is authorized under this section or for which the fee is waived or modified under AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.430

may be issued only to a natural person.

Subject to regulations adopted by the Board of Game, a person who holds a nuisance wild animal control license may engage in the control of nuisance wild birds and nuisance wild small mammals for compensation.

If the commissioner determines that residents of the state are entitled to obtain licenses for sport fishing, including sport fishing for anadromous king salmon, in Yukon, Canada, for the same fees that are charged to residents of Yukon for comparable sport fishing licenses, the commissioner may adopt regulations authorizing residents of Yukon to receive

nonresident annual sport fishing licenses for the fees charged to residents under (a) of this section for a resident sport fishing license; and

nonresident anadromous king salmon annual tags for the fee charged to residents under (a) of this section for a resident anadromous king salmon tag.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]

In addition to the fees for a hunting license set out in (a) and (d) of this section, each person who purchases a hunting license shall pay an intensive management surcharge as set out in this subsection for the purpose of providing funding for the intensive management of the state's game populations under AS

16.05.255(e)

. A person who is eligible for a $5 resident hunting, trapping, and sport fishing license under (a)(6) of this section or a free license under AS

16.05.341

is exempt from payment of the surcharge imposed under this subsection. The amount of the surcharge attached to each hunting license must be clearly disclosed on the license. Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, the intensive management surcharge for each

resident hunting license available under this section is $10; and

nonresident hunting license available under this section is $30.

History.

(§ 2 art II ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 96 SLA 1959; am §§ 7 — 13 ch 131 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 1963; am § 2 ch 31 SLA 1963; am §§ 2, 3 ch 75 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 32 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1972; am §§ 1, 2 ch 180 SLA 1972; am §§ 2, 3 ch 82 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 198 SLA 1976; am §§ 1, 2 ch 268 SLA 1976; am §§ 1, 2 ch 73 SLA 1979; am § 2 ch 19 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 2, 4 ch 57 SLA 1980; am §§ 16, 17 ch 94 SLA 1980; am §§ 1 — 6 ch 40 SLA 1982; am §§ 2, 3 ch 23 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 71 SLA 1984; am §§ 15 — 17 ch 81 SLA 1984; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 96 SLA 1984; am §§ 12, 13 ch 132 SLA 1984; am § 27 ch 71 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 70 SLA 1987; am §§ 4, 5 ch 88 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 6 SLA 1989; am E.O. No. 73 § 3 (1989); am §§ 1 — 3 ch 28 SLA 1990; am §§ 3 — 14 ch 211 SLA 1990; am § 14 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am § 4 ch 81 SLA 1992; am § 44 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 9 SLA 1994; am § 16 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1997; am §§ 1, 2 ch 70 SLA 1997; am §§ 2 — 8, 10 ch 74 SLA 1997; am §§ 68, 69 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 50 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 118 SLA 2003; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 132 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 2004; am §§ 3, 4 ch 94 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 2010; am §§ 4 — 22 ch 18 SLA 2016; am §§ 1, 5 ch 30 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraphs (a)(3) and (4) were formerly (a)(3)(A) and (3)(B) respectively. Renumbered in 1983, at which time the remaining paragraphs in (a) were renumbered accordingly.

Section 33,
ch. 18, SLA 2016, would have repealed subsection (k), effective December 31, 2022; however, section 33 was subsequently repealed by sec. 1,
ch. 26, SLA 2021, effective November 23, 2021, which had the effect of continuing subsection (k).

Cross references. —

For findings, purpose, and intent relating to the 2000 amendment of (a)(22) of this section, see sec. 1, ch. 50, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision imposing a duty on the commissioner of revenue to provide information about the bonds issued under AS

37.15.765

—

37.15.799

and the date that the principal amount of those bonds, together with the interest on them and any interest owing on unpaid installments of interest, and all other obligations with respect to the bonds, are fully met and discharged, see § 6(a), ch. 94, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For aquatic farming, see 5 AAC 41, art. 4.

For aquarium stocking, see 5 AAC 41, art. 5.

For licenses, harvest tickets, harvest reports, tags, and fees, see 5 AAC 92, art. 2.

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

For emergency taking, see 5 AAC 92, art. 9.

For educational fishery program, see 5 AAC 93, art. 2.

For license officers, see 15 AAC 116, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective November 23, 2021, repealed the delayed repeal of (k).

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent in connection with the amendment to (a)(6) of this section by § 1,
ch. 28, SLA 1990 (HCS CSSB 30(Fin)), see 1990 House Journal 2733.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Construing subsection (d) with federal law ( 10 U.S.C. § 2671(a)), a member of the military who does not qualify as a resident under
AS

16.05.940

is required to obtain an Alaska sport fishing license to engage in sport fishing on military lands.
1977 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21.

Construing
AS

16.05.330

and this section with federal law ( 10 U.S.C. § 2671(a)), a member of the military who does not qualify as a resident under
AS

16.05.940

is not required to obtain an Alaska trapping license to trap on military lands.
1977 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21.

The special small game hunting license for military personnel authorized by subsection (d) may not be used for hunting all game (including big game) once the holder achieves resident status. 1977 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21.

The terms “scientific,” “propagative,” and “educational” in this statute should be read as addressing purposes similar to those in AS

16.05.050

(6), and the term “propagative,” in the context of “scientific” or “educational” purposes, does not appear to include the holding of game animals as pets.
Apr. 2, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.